Nebraska, session 109, LB456.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB456 LB456
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 48-146.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
48-146.02 (1)(a) If a three-judge panel of the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Court finds, after due notice and hearing at which the
workers' compensation insurer is entitled to be heard and present
evidence, that such insurer has failed to comply with an obligation under
the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act with such frequency as to indicate
a general business practice to engage in that type of conduct, the three-
judge panel may request the Director of Insurance to suspend or revoke
the authorization of such insurer to write workers' compensation
insurance under the provisions of Chapter 44 and such act. Such
suspension or revocation shall not affect the liability of any such
insurer under policies in force prior to the suspension or revocation.
(b) If a three-judge panel of the compensation court finds, after
due notice and hearing at which the risk management pool is entitled to
be heard and present evidence, that such pool has failed to comply with
an obligation under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, as set out in
subsection (1) of section 44-4319, with such frequency as to indicate a
general business practice to engage in that type of conduct, the three-
judge panel may suspend or revoke the authority of the pool to provide
group self-insurance coverage of workers' compensation liability pursuant
to the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act. Such suspension or
revocation shall not affect the liability of any such risk management
pool under the terms of the agreement forming the pool in force prior to
the suspension or revocation.
(c) If a three-judge panel of the compensation court finds, after
due notice and hearing at which the self-insurer is entitled to be heard
and present evidence, that such self-insurer has failed to comply with an
obligation under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act with such
frequency as to indicate a general business practice to engage in that
type of conduct, the three-judge panel may revoke the approval of such
-2-

LB456 LB456
2025 2025
self-insurer to provide self-insurance coverage of workers' compensation
liability pursuant to section 48-145. Such revocation shall not affect
the liability of any such self-insurer under an approval by the
compensation court to self-insure in force prior to the revocation.
(d) The Attorney General, when requested by the administrator of the
compensation court, may file a motion pursuant to section 48-162.03 for
an order directing a workers' compensation insurer, risk management pool,
or self-insurer to appear before a three-judge panel of the compensation
court and show cause as to why the panel should not take action pursuant
to this subsection. The Attorney General shall be considered a party for
purposes of such motion. The Attorney General may appear before the
three-judge panel and present evidence that the workers' compensation
insurer, risk management pool, or self-insurer has failed to comply with
an obligation under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act with such
frequency as to indicate a general business practice to engage in that
type of conduct. The presiding judge shall rule on a motion of the
Attorney General pursuant to this subdivision and, if applicable, shall
appoint judges of the compensation court to serve on the three-judge
panel. The presiding judge shall not serve on such panel.
(e) Appeal from an action by a three-judge panel of the compensation
court pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) or (1)(c) of this section shall be
in accordance with section 48-185.
(2) In addition to any other obligations under the Nebraska Workers'
Compensation Act, the following acts or practices, when committed with
such frequency as to indicate a general business practice to engage in
that type of conduct, shall subject the workers' compensation insurer,
risk management pool, or self-insurer to action pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section:
(a) Knowingly misrepresenting relevant facts or the provisions of
the act or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to such act;
(b) Failing to acknowledge with reasonable promptness pertinent
-3-

LB456 LB456
2025 2025
communications with respect to claims arising under the act;
(c) Failing to promptly investigate claims arising under the act;
(d) Not attempting in good faith to effectuate prompt, fair, and
equitable payment of benefits when compensability has become reasonably
clear;
(e) Refusing to pay benefits without conducting a reasonable
investigation;
(f) Failing to affirm or deny compensability of a claim within a
reasonable time after having completed the investigation related to such
claim;
(g) Paying substantially less than amounts owed under the act where
there is no reasonable controversy;
(h) Making payment to an injured employee, beneficiary of a deceased
employee, or provider of medical, surgical, or hospital services without
providing a reasonable and accurate explanation of the basis for the
payment;
(i) Unreasonably delaying the investigation or payment of benefits
by knowingly requiring excessive verification or duplication of
information;
(j) Failing, in the case of the denial of compensability or the
denial, change in, or termination of benefits, to promptly provide a
reasonable and accurate explanation of the basis for such action to the
injured employee or beneficiary of a deceased employee;
(k) Failing, in the case of the denial of payment for medical,
surgical, or hospital services, to promptly provide a reasonable and
accurate explanation of the basis for such action to the provider of such
services; or
(l) Failing to provide the compensation court's address and
telephone number to an injured employee or beneficiary of a deceased
employee with instructions to contact the court for further information:
(i) At or near the time the workers' compensation insurer, risk
-4-

LB456 LB456
2025 2025
management pool, or self-insurer receives notice or has knowledge of the
injury; and
(ii) At or near the time of the denial of compensability or the
denial, change in, or termination of benefits.
(3) In order for a workers' compensation insurer, risk management
pool, or self-insurer to fulfill the obligations of subsection (2) of
this section, an employee filing a claim for workers' compensation
benefits with a workers' compensation insurer, risk management pool, or
self-insurer shall provide a patient's waiver to the workers'
compensation insurer, risk management pool, self-insurer, or employer
upon the request by the same, allowing the employee's employer or
workers' compensation insurer, risk management pool, or self-insurer or
its representative to obtain all previous hospital and medical records,
including patient information forms, concerning the employee's previous
treatment with any physician, psychologist, or other medical provider. A
workers' compensation insurer, risk management pool, self-insurer, or
employer shall not be entitled to an employee's hospital or medical
records that pertain to an employee's previous treatment for sexual
abuse, human immunodeficiency virus, reproductive health conditions, or
mental health conditions by way of a patient's waiver unless the employee
is seeking benefits for mental health injuries or alcohol or controlled
substance abuse. The compensation court shall develop a patient's waiver
form to implement this subsection. Failure to provide a patient's waiver
shall toll the commencement of the thirty-day period for purposes of
liability under section 48-125. Any physician, psychologist, hospital,
institution, or other person releasing the information to the employee's
employer, workers' compensation insurer, risk management pool, or self-
insurer or its representative shall not be liable criminally or for civil
damages by reason of the release of the information pursuant to the
patient's waiver.
(4) (3) In order to determine compliance with obligations under the
-5-

LB456 LB456
2025 2025
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, the compensation court or its
designee may examine the workers' compensation records of (a) a workers'
compensation insurer, a risk management pool, or a self-insurer or (b) an
adjuster, a third-party administrator, or other agent acting on behalf of
such workers' compensation insurer, risk management pool, or self-
insurer. The authority of the compensation court pursuant to this
subsection is subject to the limitations provided under the work-product
doctrine and attorney-client privilege as recognized in Nebraska law.
(5) (4) The compensation court may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to implement this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 48-146.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-6-